Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-308] Expedited enforcement of
child-custody determination. (a) A petition under this part shall be
verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any
order confirming registration shall be attached to the petition. A copy of a
certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

(b) A petition for enforcement of a
child-custody determination must state:

(1) Whether the court that issued the determination
identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction
and, if so, what the basis was;

(2) Whether the determination for which enforcement
is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must
be enforced under this chapter and, if so, identify the court, the case number,
and the nature of the proceeding;

(3) Whether any proceeding has been commenced that
could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic
violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and,
if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

(4) The present physical address of the child and the
respondent, if known;

(5) Whether relief in addition to the immediate
physical custody of the child and attorney's fees is sought, including a
request for assistance from law enforcement officers and, if so, the relief
sought; and

(6) If the child-custody determination has been
registered and confirmed under section 583A-305, the date and place of
registration.

(c) Upon the filing of a petition, the court
shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or
without the child at a hearing and may enter any order necessary to ensure the
safety of the parties and the child. The hearing shall be held on the first
judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request
of the petitioner.

(d) An order issued under subsection (c) must
state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the
hearing the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical
custody of the child and the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under section
583A-312, and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is
appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

(1) The child-custody determination has not been
registered and confirmed under section 583A-305, and that:

(A) The issuing court did not have
jurisdiction under part II;

(B) The child-custody determination for which
enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having
jurisdiction to do so under part II;

(C) The respondent was entitled to notice,
but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of section 583A-108,
in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement
is sought; or

(2) The child-custody determination for which
enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 583A-305, but
has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction
to do so under part II. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next